Florida, session 2026, SB1382.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 35 36 Section 1.âSection 474.201, Florida Statutes, is amended to 37 read: 38 474.201âPurpose.âThe Legislature finds that the practice of 39 veterinary medicine is potentially dangerous to the public 40 health and safety if conducted by incompetent and unlicensed 41 practitioners and veterinary technicians. The legislative 42 purpose in enacting this chapter is to ensure that every 43 veterinarian and licensed veterinary technician practicing in 44 this state meet minimum requirements for safe practice. It is 45 the legislative intent that veterinarians and licensed 46 veterinary technicians who are incompetent not normally 47 competent or who otherwise present a danger to the public shall 48 be disciplined or prohibited from practicing in this state. 49 Section 2.âPresent subsections (6) through (12), (13), and 50 (14) of section 474.202, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 51 subsections (7) through (13), (15), and (19), respectively, and 52 new subsections (6) and (14) and subsections (16), (17), and 53 (18) are added to that section, to read: 54 474.202âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter: 55 (6)ââLicensed veterinary technicianâ means a person who 56 practices veterinary technology in this state and is licensed 57 under the authority of this chapter. 58 (14)ââVeterinary assistantâ means a person who practices on 59 a veterinary team providing medical care for animals and who is 60 not a licensed veterinary technician. 61 (16)ââVeterinary technicianâ means a person who has 62 graduated with an associate degree from a veterinary technology 63 training program accredited by the American Veterinary Medical 64 Association Committee on Veterinary Technician Education and 65 Activities (CVTEA). 66 (17)ââVeterinary technologistâ means a person who has 67 graduated with a bachelorâs degree from a veterinary technology 68 training program accredited by the CVTEA. 69 (18)ââVeterinary technologyâ means the science and art of 70 providing certain aspects of the medical care and treatment of 71 patients within an established veterinarian/client/patient 72 relationship by a veterinary technician or veterinary 73 technologist which are delegated and supervised by a 74 veterinarian. The term does not include diagnosis, surgery, or 75 the prescription of medications. 76 Section 3.âSubsection (2) of section 474.204, Florida 77 Statutes, is amended to read: 78 474.204âBoard of Veterinary Medicine.â 79 (2)(a)âFive members of the board must shall be licensed 80 veterinarians. 81 (b)âOne member of the board must be a licensed veterinary 82 technician who has been actively engaged in the practice of 83 veterinary technology for at least 5 years immediately preceding 84 the date of appointment to the board. 85 (c)âOne member of the board must be a layperson Two members 86 of the board shall be laypersons who is are not and has have 87 never been a veterinarian or member veterinarians or members of 88 any closely related profession or occupation. 89 Section 4.âSection 474.223, Florida Statutes, is created to 90 read: 91 474.223âLicensed veterinary technicians.â 92 (1)âThe board shall adopt rules to regulate the profession 93 and practice of veterinary technology. 94 (2)âA person may become licensed as a veterinary technician 95 if he or she submits an application to the board and meets all 96 of the following requirements: 97 (a)âHas graduated from a college program of veterinary 98 technology accredited by the American Veterinary Medical 99 Association Committee on Veterinary Technician Education and 100 Activities. 101 (b)âHas obtained a passing score on the Veterinary 102 Technician National Exam, as determined by the American 103 Association of Veterinary State Boards. 104 (c)âDemonstrates knowledge of the laws and rules governing 105 the practice of veterinary technology in this state in a manner 106 designated by rules of the board. 107 (3)âA person who is a certified veterinary technician in 108 good standing with the Florida Veterinary Technician Association 109 or the Florida Veterinary Medical Association may become 110 licensed as a veterinary technician if he or she submits an 111 application to the board and demonstrates knowledge of the laws 112 and rules governing the practice of veterinary technology in 113 this state in a manner designated by rules of the board. 114 (4)âA veterinary technician or a veterinary technologist 115 must be licensed under this section to perform the following 116 veterinary technology services under the supervision of a 117 licensed veterinarian: 118 (a)âArterial and central venous catheterization. 119 (b)âEuthanasia, under the immediate supervision of a 120 veterinarian. 121 (c)âIntraperitoneal injections. 122 (d)âPlacement of gastric, nasoesophageal, and nasogastric 123 tubes. 124 (e)âSuture or staple skin lacerations, gingival incisions, 125 or existing surgical incisions. 126 (f)âParavertebral blocks and epidurals. 127 (g)âA complex single root extraction that is beyond a 128 simple digital extraction of a tooth and that requires 129 periosteal elevation but does not require sectioning of the 130 tooth or of the bone. 131 (h)âBlood or blood component collection, preparation, and 132 administration for transfusion or blood banking purposes. 133 (i)âEar flushing with powered mechanical devices creating 134 pressure or suction. 135 (j)âA thoracentesis or an abdominocentesis. 136 (k)âApplication of casts, splints, and slings for the 137 immobilization of fractures. 138 (l)âPlacement of an epidural, an intraosseous, or a nasal 139 catheter. 140 (m)âAdministering rabies vaccinations, under the immediate 141 supervision of a veterinarian. 142 (n)âExaminations performed within a previously established 143 veterinarian/client/patient relationship for routine health care 144 needs, follow-up treatment, or accepted animal husbandry on 145 livestock, excluding an examination required for the purpose of 146 state or federal health certificates. 147 (5)âUnless otherwise provided for in this section or 148 designated by board rule, the supervising veterinarian shall 149 determine the appropriate level of supervision and protocol for 150 a service under subsection (4). All other tasks may be performed 151 by licensed or unlicensed persons at the discretion of the 152 supervising veterinarian. In determining the appropriate level 153 of supervision, the veterinarian shall consider the level of 154 training and experience of the person to whom the task is 155 delegated. However, the licensed veterinarian is responsible for 156 all services performed by such persons, regardless of licensure, 157 and only a licensed veterinarian may make or provide any 158 diagnosis, perform any surgery, or prescribe any medicinal drugs 159 as defined in s. 465.003 or controlled substances as defined in 160 s. 893.02. 161 (6)âA supervising veterinarian may, in his or her 162 discretion, delegate to a licensed veterinary technician the 163 responsibility of supervising a task performed by an unlicensed 164 person, except for a service under subsection (4). 165 (7)(a)âA person may not: 166 1.âLead others to believe that he or she is a licensed 167 veterinary technician or is engaged in the licensed practice of 168 veterinary technology unless he or she holds a valid, active 169 license under this section. 170 2.âUse the name or title âlicensed veterinary technicianâ 171 if he or she is not licensed pursuant to this section. 172 (b)âA veterinary assistant may not identify himself or 173 herself as a veterinary technician or a licensed veterinary 174 technician unless he or she is a graduate of an accredited 175 veterinary technology program or licensed under this chapter, as 176 applicable. 177 (c)âA person who violates this subsection commits a 178 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 179 775.082 or s. 775.083. 180 Section 5.âSubsection (1) of section 828.30, Florida 181 Statutes, is amended to read: 182 828.30âRabies vaccination of dogs, cats, and ferrets.â 183 (1)(a)âAll dogs, cats, and ferrets 4 months of age or older 184 must be vaccinated by a licensed veterinarian, a licensed 185 veterinary technician under the immediate supervision of a 186 veterinarian, or a person authorized under paragraph (b) against 187 rabies with a vaccine that is licensed by the United States 188 Department of Agriculture for use in those species. 189 (b)âActing under the indirect supervision of a 190 veterinarian, an employee, an agent, or a contractor of a county 191 or municipal animal control authority or sheriff may vaccinate 192 against rabies dogs, cats, and ferrets that are in the custody 193 of an animal control authority or a sheriff and which will be 194 transferred, rescued, fostered, adopted, or reclaimed by the 195 owner. The supervising veterinarian assumes responsibility for 196 any person vaccinating animals at his or her direction or under 197 his or her direct or indirect supervision. As used in this 198 paragraph, the term âindirect supervisionâ means that the 199 supervising veterinarian is required to be available for 200 consultation through telecommunications but is not required to 201 be physically present during such consultation. 202 (c)âThe owner of every dog, cat, and ferret shall have the 203 animal revaccinated 12 months after the initial vaccination. 204 Thereafter, the interval between vaccinations shall conform to 205 the vaccine manufacturerâs directions. The cost of vaccination 206 must be borne by the animalâs owner. Evidence of circulating 207 rabies virus neutralizing antibodies may not be used as a 208 substitute for current vaccination in managing rabies exposure 209 or determining the need for booster vaccinations. 210 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.